Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Repeal of Certain Provisions

§ 19-5-371.
Repeal of Sections 19-5-303, 19-5-313, 19-5-319, 19-5-331, 19-5-333, 19-5-335, 19-5-337, 19-5-339, 19-5-341, 19-5-353, 19-5-357, 19-5-359, and 19-5-361.

Sections 19-5-303, 19-5-313, 19-5-319, 19-5-331, 19-5-333, 19-5-335, 19-5-337, 19-5-339, 19-5-341, 19-5-353, 19-5-357, 19-5-359 and 19-5-361 shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2021.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 367, § 12; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 593, § 12; Laws, 2010, ch. 560, § 12; Laws, 2014, ch. 387, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 381, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2018.